Washington statutes.
RCW 41.76.085

Limitations on application of chapter.

Except as otherwise expressly provided in this chapter, this chapter shall not be construed to deny or otherwise abridge any rights, privileges, or benefits granted by law to employees. This chapter shall not be construed to interfere with the responsibilities and rights of the board of regents or board of trustees as specified by federal and state law.

[ 2002 c 356 s 21.]